Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-809
Auditor of Public Accounts; audit;
Tax Commissioner; reports.

(1) The books, records, funds,
and accounts of the division shall be audited at least annually by or under
the direction of the Auditor of Public Accounts who shall submit a report
of the audit to the Governor and the Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. The expenses of the audit shall be paid from the
State Lottery Operation Cash Fund.

(2) The Tax Commissioner shall make an annual written report by November
1 of each year to the Governor and the Legislature, which report shall include
a summary of the activities of the division for the previous fiscal year through
June 30, a statement detailing lottery revenue, prize disbursements, expenses
of the division, and allocation of remaining revenue, and any recommendations
for change in the statutes which the Tax Commissioner deems necessary or desirable. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. The report shall be a public
record.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 9;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 25;

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 116;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 13.